Washington statutes.
RCW 43.136.045

Schedule for review of tax preferences—Expedited review—Citizen input.

(1) The citizen commission for performance measurement of tax preferences must develop a schedule to accomplish an orderly review of tax preferences at least once every ten years. In determining the schedule, the commission must consider the order the tax preferences were enacted into law, in addition to other factors including but not limited to grouping preferences for review by type of industry, economic sector, or policy area. The commission may elect to include, anywhere in the schedule, a tax preference that has a statutory expiration date. The commission must omit from the schedule tax preferences that are required by constitutional law, sales and use tax exemptions for machinery and equipment for manufacturing, research and development, or testing, the small business credit for the business and occupation tax, sales and use tax exemptions for food and prescription drugs, property tax relief for retired persons, and property tax valuations based on current use, and may omit any tax preference that the commission determines is a critical part of the structure of the tax system. As an alternative to the process under RCW 43.136.055, the commission may recommend to the joint legislative audit and review committee an expedited review process for any tax preference.

(2) The commission must revise the schedule as needed each year, taking into account newly enacted or terminated tax preferences. The commission must deliver the schedule to the joint legislative audit and review committee by September 1st of each year.

(3) The commission must provide a process for effective citizen input during its deliberations.

[ 2011 c 335 s 2; 2006 c 197 s 4.]